Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.082

License—Reciprocity.

An applicant holding a license to practice podiatric medicine and surgery in another state may be licensed without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's licensing standards are substantively equivalent to the standards in this state.

[ 1990 c 147 s 10.]